Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 7
COSTS OF OIL SPILL RESPONSE

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Spills, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Oil and Gas and Deep Drilling, Sec. 391-3-13-16.

12-5-500. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Damages" means damages of any kind for which liability may exist under the laws of this state resulting from, arising out of, or related to the discharge or threatened discharge of oil.

"Discharge" means any emission, other than natural seepage, whether intentional or unintentional, and includes, but is not limited to, spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, or dumping.

"Federal on-scene coordinator" means the federal official designated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the United States Coast Guard to coordinate and direct federal responses under subpart D or the official designated by the lead agency to coordinate and direct removal under subpart E of the National Contingency Plan.

"National Contingency Plan" means the National Contingency Plan prepared and published under Section 311(d) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. Section 1321(d), as amended by the federal Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-380, 104 Stat. 484 (1990).

"Oil" means oil of any kind or in any form, including, but not limited to, petroleum, fuel oil, sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes other than dredged spoil.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, state, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state, or any interstate body.

"Removal costs" means the costs of removal that are incurred after a discharge of oil has occurred or, in any case in which there is a substantial threat of a discharge of oil, the costs to prevent, minimize, or mitigate oil pollution from such an incident.

"Responsible party" means a responsible party as defined under Section 1001 of the federal Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-380, 104 Stat. 484 (1990).

(Code 1981, §

12-5-500

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1598, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12.)

12-5-501. Liability for removal costs or damages; exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person is not liable for removal costs or damages which result from actions taken or omitted to be taken in the course of rendering care, assistance, or advice consistent with the National Contingency Plan or as otherwise directed by the federal on-scene coordinator or by any state official with responsibility for oil spill response.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply:

To a responsible party;

With respect to personal injury or wrongful death;

If the person is grossly negligent or engages in willful misconduct; or

To a response under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Section 9601, et seq.).

A responsible party shall be liable for any removal costs and damages that another person is relieved of under subsection (a) of this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall affect the liability of a responsible party for oil spill response under any applicable state law.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-501

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1598, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For article on CERCLA liability for secured creditors, see 41 Emory L.J. 167 (1992).